Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 223.301 is amended to read:
223.301. (1) As used in  this section, “employer” means any person who contracts to pay
remuneration for, and secures the right to direct and control the services of, any person.
(2) A local government may not establish or impose a system development charge that  requires
an employer to pay a reimbursement fee or an improvement fee based on:
(a) The number of individuals hired by the employer after a specified date; or
(b) A  methodology that assumes that costs are necessarily incurred for capital improvements
when an employer hires an additional employee.
(3) A methodology set forth in an ordinance or resolution that establishes  an improvement fee
or a reimbursement fee shall not include or incorporate any method or system under  which the
payment of  the fee or the amount of the fee is determined by the number of employees of an em-
ployer without regard to new construction, new development or new  use of an existing structure
by the employer.
(4) A local government may not impose  a system development charge for increased use of a
transportation facility that  results from the production of marijuana on a property located in an
exclusive farm use zone.
(5) A local government may not impose or increase a system development charge for:
(a) The installation of a  National Fire Protection Association 13D residential fire sprin-
kler system; or
(b) The difference  between the increased capacity of a water meter required by the fire
sprinkler system and the capacity of the water meter that  would be required for the dwelling
without the fire sprinkler system installed.
Enrolled House Bill 3505 (HB 3505-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3505 (HB 3505-A) Page 2